Hawaii statutes.
[§346-404] Termination of jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction under this part shall terminate when:

(1) The young adult has reached the age of twenty-one
years;

(2) The young adult chooses to terminate the
voluntary care agreement and stop receiving extended foster care services if
the young adult:

(A) Has voluntarily signed a document
attesting to the fact that the young adult no longer consents to the court's
jurisdiction;

(B) Has been informed in writing of the
effects of terminating voluntary foster care early; and

(C) Has been informed in writing of the
option to reestablish jurisdiction before reaching age twenty-one and the
procedures to do so; or

(3) After a court finds that:

(A) The young adult no longer meets the
eligibility requirements as set forth in section 346-395; or

(B) Despite the fact that the department has
made ongoing reasonable efforts to provide the young adult with services, the
young adult is in material noncompliance with the case plan. [L 2013, c 252, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next